Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB439.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(a) of the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act, is amended to read:Section 4. Powers and Duties.--(a) The council shall (1) establish standards for apprenticeship in conformity with the provisions of this act and applicable statutes and regulations of the Federal Government; (2) adopt such rules and regulations, subject [only] to section 4.1 and the approval of the Secretary of Labor and Industry, as may be necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this act; (3) compile such data on population and employment trends, industrial production, 123456789101112131415161718192021 vocational and industrial education and job requirements as may be deemed necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this act; (4) to terminate or cancel any apprenticeship agreements in accordance with the provisions of such agreements or order modifications of such agreements; (5) maintain close liaison with Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training, the United States Department of Labor, the State Board of Vocational Education, the Department of Public Instruction, the Department of Commerce, Bureau of Rehabilitation of the Department of Labor and Industry, and Juvenile Forestry Camps under the Department of Public Welfare, and such other agencies which carry on programs closely related to the purposes of this act; (6) conduct studies, surveys and investigations of the special problems of retraining or training unemployed or employed persons to improve or modernize work skills and make appropriate recommendations to cooperating agencies described above, local community organizations, local school boards and the Secretary of Labor and Industry; (7) act as a convening agency in local communities to bring together local representatives of employes, employers, educational agencies and industrial development agencies in order to promote closer local cooperation in establishing better apprenticeship and other training programs including programs for employed persons who wish to improve and modernize their work skills; (8) use appropriate media of information and education to acquaint employers, employes and the public at large with the advantages and availability of apprenticeship and other occupational training programs; (9) study the effectiveness of apprenticeship agreements and make recommendations in accordance with the provisions of such agreements for their improvement; and (10) perform such other 20250SB0439PN0410 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 duties as may be necessary to give full effect to the provisions of this act.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Supervision.--(a) Rules and regulations under section 4(a)(2) providing for the ratio of apprentices to journeymen must be consistent with proper supervision, training and continuity of employment. Subject to subsection (c), the rules and regulations may not require any of the following:(1) More than three supervisors for each apprentice or trainee in a high-hazard occupation.(2) More than two supervisors for each apprentice or trainee in a medium-hazard occupation.(3) More than one supervisor for each apprentice or trainee in a low-hazard occupation.(b) The hazard level of an occupation shall be determined by a review of the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics occupational fatality rate per one hundred thousand full-time equivalent employes. The following shall apply:(1) The determination of the hazard level shall be based on the average fatality rates for the last three full calendar years for which data is available, as follows:(i) A fatality rate of nine or more fatalities per one hundred thousand full-time equivalent employes shall be a high-hazard occupation.(ii) A fatality rate greater than two and less than nine fatalities per one hundred thousand full-time equivalent employes shall be a medium-hazard occupation.(iii) A fatality rate of two or fewer fatalities per one 20250SB0439PN0410 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hundred thousand full-time equivalent employes shall be a low-hazard occupation.(2) No later than January 31 of each year, the review under this subsection must be completed.(3) No later than March 1 of each year, t he Department of Labor and Industry shall:(i) Compile the average fatality rates for each occupation and a list of the occupations for which the hazard level and ratio requirement have changed.(ii) Transmit the information under subparagraph (i) to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(4) No later than April 30 of each year, the Department of Labor and Industry shall notify in writing each program sponsor that is impacted by a change to an occupational hazard level or a different ratio requirement.(5) A change to an occupational hazard level or ratio requirement shall take effect July 1 of the year in which the publication is made under paragraph (3)(ii).(c) Notwithstanding the limits in subsection (a), the following shall apply:(1) When an apprentice or trainee is employed by an enterprise that employs fewer than fifty full-time equivalent employes, rules and regulations under section 4(a)(2) providing for the ratio of apprentices to journeymen may not require more than one supervisor for each of the first three apprentices or trainees employed. If more than three apprentices or trainees are employed, rules and regulations may not require more than three supervisors for every two apprentices or trainees employed after the first three apprentices or trainees.20250SB0439PN0410 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Rules and regulations under section 4(a)(2) providing for the ratio of apprentices to journeymen shall provide for consistent ratios between joint and nonjoint programs. If the prevailing practice among joint programs for a specific occupation in this Commonwealth, as evidenced by collective bargaining agreements, allows less supervision than required by rules and regulations issued under section 4(a)(2), a nonjoint program for the same occupation shall be allowed to utilize a ratio of apprentices to journeymen that is consistent with the prevailing practice among joint programs.Section 3. The provisions of 34 Pa. Code § 83.5(b)(7) are abrogated.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0439PN0410 - 5 - 12345678910111213